Utah statutes.
39-6-13.   Limits on nonjudicial punishment.
(1)  Regulations prescribed by the governor, and additional regulations
prescribed by the adjutant general of Utah may place limitations on authority
concerning nonjudicial punishment under this chapter, regarding:
(a)  imposing punishment of any type or amount;
(b)  the categories of commanding officers who have the authority to impose
punishment;
(c)  procedures for appeal of nonjudicial findings and punishment; and
(d)  suspension and reimposition of nonjudicial punishment.
(2)  Punishment may be imposed under this section on any person subject to
this chapter.
(3)  Regulations permitting nonjudicial punishment shall provide for de novo
review on appeal of both the findings and punishment.
(a)  Any appeal shall be limited to the next two higher commanding officers.
(b)  On appeal, the findings or punishment may be modified or set aside.
(c)  In no case may the appeal increase the amount of punishment originally
imposed.
(4)  The decision of the adjutant general to impose nonjudicial punishment
upon a person subject to this chapter or to resolve an appeal of the
punishment is final and may not be subject to appeal or judicial review.
(5)  A person subject to this chapter may request trial by a military court in
lieu of nonjudicial punishment at any time prior to imposition of nonjudicial
punishment.
(a)  Upon receipt of a timely request for trial in lieu of nonjudicial
punishment, the commanding officer having authority may:
(i)  deny the request and impose nonjudicial punishment; or
(ii)  grant the request.
(b)  Denial of a request for court martial in lieu of nonjudicial punishment
may not create a private right of action and is not subject to judicial
review.
